Hawaii statutes.
§431:2-103 Salary. The salary of the
commissioner shall be set by the director of commerce and consumer affairs but
shall not be more than the maximum salary of first deputies to department
heads. [L 1987 c 347, pt of §2]

Cross References

Salary of deputies or assistants, see §26-53.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next